dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4792 N 1
SFX 4792 0 nüzce .

SFX 4793 N 1
SFX 4793 0 nüzdeki .

SFX 4794 N 1
SFX 4794 0 nüzdekini .

SFX 4795 N 1
SFX 4795 0 lerinkidir .

SFX 4796 N 1
SFX 4796 0 nünkiyle .

SFX 4797 N 1
SFX 4797 0 süsünüz .

SFX 4798 N 1
SFX 4798 0 süydük .

SFX 4799 N 1
SFX 4799 0 süydüler .

SFX 4800 N 1
SFX 4800 0 yümdür .

SFX 4801 N 1
SFX 4801 0 lerimce .

SFX 4802 N 1
SFX 4802 0 düydük .

SFX 4803 N 1
SFX 4803 0 düydünüz .

SFX 4804 N 1
SFX 4804 0 deymişler .

SFX 4805 N 1
SFX 4805 0 imizdiyse .

SFX 4806 N 1
SFX 4806 0 imizidir .

SFX 4807 N 1
SFX 4807 0 inizidir .

SFX 4808 N 1
SFX 4808 0 mizdeyse .

SFX 4809 N 1
SFX 4809 0 mizdendi .

SFX 4810 N 1
SFX 4810 0 ünüzdür .

SFX 4811 N 1
SFX 4811 0 ürdür .

SFX 4812 N 1
SFX 4812 0 mcesidirler .

SFX 4813 N 1
SFX 4813 0 mcesinden .

SFX 4814 N 1
SFX 4814 0 mcesine .

SFX 4815 N 1
SFX 4815 0 mcesini .

SFX 4816 N 1
SFX 4816 0 mcesinin .

SFX 4817 N 1
SFX 4817 0 mcesiyim .

SFX 4818 N 1
SFX 4818 0 ndülerse .

SFX 4819 N 1
SFX 4819 0 ndünüz .

SFX 4820 N 1
SFX 4820 0 ndüyse .

SFX 4821 N 1
SFX 4821 0 ndüyseler .

SFX 4822 N 1
SFX 4822 0 ndüysen .

SFX 4823 N 1
SFX 4823 0 nesiniz .

SFX 4824 N 1
SFX 4824 0 zizdir .

SFX 4825 N 1
SFX 4825 0 zliğe .

SFX 4826 N 1
SFX 4826 0 zliği .

SFX 4827 N 1
SFX 4827 0 zliğimi .

SFX 4828 N 1
SFX 4828 0 zliğimizin .

SFX 4829 N 1
SFX 4829 0 zliğin .

SFX 4830 N 1
SFX 4830 0 zliğinde .

SFX 4831 N 1
SFX 4831 0 zliğinden .

SFX 4832 N 1
SFX 4832 0 zliğine .

SFX 4833 N 1
SFX 4833 0 zliğini .

SFX 4834 N 1
SFX 4834 0 zliğinizin .

SFX 4835 N 1
SFX 4835 0 zliğiyle .

SFX 4836 N 1
SFX 4836 0 zlik .

SFX 4837 N 1
SFX 4837 0 zlikle .

SFX 4838 N 1
SFX 4838 0 zliklerinden .

SFX 4839 N 1
SFX 4839 0 zliklerinin .

SFX 4840 N 1
SFX 4840 0 zlikte .

SFX 4841 N 1
SFX 4841 0 zlikten .

SFX 4842 N 1
SFX 4842 0 nmüşsen .

SFX 4843 N 1
SFX 4843 0 nmüşsün .

SFX 4844 N 1
SFX 4844 0 nmüşsünüz .

SFX 4845 N 1
SFX 4845 0 nselerdi .

SFX 4846 N 1
SFX 4846 0 dekilerdeki .

SFX 4847 N 1
SFX 4847 0 sündedirler .

SFX 4848 N 1
SFX 4848 0 sündeler .

SFX 4849 N 1
SFX 4849 0 sündesiniz .

SFX 4850 N 1
SFX 4850 0 sündeydik .

SFX 4851 N 1
SFX 4851 0 sündeydiler .

SFX 4852 N 1
SFX 4852 0 sündeydim .

SFX 4853 N 1
SFX 4853 0 sündeyse .

SFX 4854 N 1
SFX 4854 0 süyken .

SFX 4855 N 1
SFX 4855 0 ymüşçesine .

SFX 4856 N 1
SFX 4856 0 ürlüğümüz .

SFX 4857 N 1
SFX 4857 0 ürlüğümüzü .

SFX 4858 N 1
SFX 4858 0 ürlüğümüzün .

SFX 4859 N 1
SFX 4859 0 ürlüğünüzün .

SFX 4860 N 1
SFX 4860 0 ürlüklerine .

SFX 4861 N 1
SFX 4861 0 ürmüşçesine .

SFX 4862 N 1
SFX 4862 0 ürdüler .

SFX 4863 N 1
SFX 4863 0 ürmüşsün .

SFX 4864 N 1
SFX 4864 0 irliğimden .

SFX 4865 N 1
SFX 4865 0 lerimmiş .

SFX 4866 N 1
SFX 4866 0 müşmüşler .

SFX 4867 N 1
SFX 4867 0 tekilerine .

SFX 4868 N 1
SFX 4868 0 ümledir .

SFX 4869 N 1
SFX 4869 0 ümüzce .

SFX 4870 N 1
SFX 4870 0 ümüzdekine .

SFX 4871 N 1
SFX 4871 0 ümüzdeydi .

SFX 4872 N 1
SFX 4872 0 ündeymişiz .

SFX 4873 N 1
SFX 4873 0 ündeysek .

SFX 4874 N 1
SFX 4874 0 ündeyseniz .

SFX 4875 N 1
SFX 4875 0 ünüzüz .

SFX 4876 N 1
SFX 4876 0 ndaymışlar .

SFX 4877 N 1
SFX 4877 0 lerindendiniz .

SFX 4878 N 1
SFX 4878 0 lerimsin .

SFX 4879 N 1
SFX 4879 0 ymüşsün .

SFX 4880 N 1
SFX 4880 0 ymüşsünüz .

SFX 4881 N 1
SFX 4881 0 ümdedir .

SFX 4882 N 1
SFX 4882 0 ümdesin .

SFX 4883 N 1
SFX 4883 0 ümsün .

SFX 4884 N 1
SFX 4884 0 ümüzse .

SFX 4885 N 1
SFX 4885 0 üneydi .

SFX 4886 N 1
SFX 4886 0 üyleyim .

SFX 4887 N 1
SFX 4887 0 larındasınızdır .

SFX 4888 N 1
SFX 4888 0 larınızdayımdır .

SFX 4889 N 1
SFX 4889 0 takilerdendi .

SFX 4890 N 1
SFX 4890 0 takilerinki .

SFX 4891 N 1
SFX 4891 0 takilerinse .

SFX 4892 N 1
SFX 4892 0 tandırlar .

SFX 4893 N 1
SFX 4893 0 nündür .

SFX 4894 N 1
SFX 4894 0 sündür .

SFX 4895 N 1
SFX 4895 0 ymüşüz .

SFX 4896 N 1
SFX 4896 0 yüzdür .

SFX 4897 N 1
SFX 4897 0 ündeymişim .

SFX 4898 N 1
SFX 4898 0 üdürler .

SFX 4899 N 1
SFX 4899 0 ümsek .

SFX 4900 N 1
SFX 4900 0 ümsen .

SFX 4901 N 1
SFX 4901 0 'ünkine .

SFX 4902 N 1
SFX 4902 0 ünkini .

SFX 4903 N 1
SFX 4903 0 larımdaysa .

SFX 4904 N 1
SFX 4904 0 'dekinin .

SFX 4905 N 1
SFX 4905 0 dekininse .

SFX 4906 N 1
SFX 4906 0 inkilerini .

SFX 4907 N 1
SFX 4907 0 lerdeymişiz .

SFX 4908 N 1
SFX 4908 0 ümdeydik .

SFX 4909 N 1
SFX 4909 0 ümdeydim .

SFX 4910 N 1
SFX 4910 0 ümdeysem .

SFX 4911 N 1
SFX 4911 0 ümüzdekiler .

SFX 4912 N 1
SFX 4912 0 ümüzdekilerde .

SFX 4913 N 1
SFX 4913 0 ümüzdekilerden .

SFX 4914 N 1
SFX 4914 0 ümüzdekilere .

SFX 4915 N 1
SFX 4915 0 ümüzdekileri .

SFX 4916 N 1
SFX 4916 0 ümüzdekilerin .

SFX 4917 N 1
SFX 4917 0 ümüzdekilerle .

SFX 4918 N 1
SFX 4918 0 ümüzdekini .

SFX 4919 N 1
SFX 4919 0 ümüzdekinin .

SFX 4920 N 1
SFX 4920 0 ümüzdekiyle .

SFX 4921 N 1
SFX 4921 0 ümüzdeydik .

SFX 4922 N 1
SFX 4922 0 ümüzdeyim .

SFX 4923 N 1
SFX 4923 0 ümüzdeyiz .

SFX 4924 N 1
SFX 4924 0 ümüzdeyizdir .

SFX 4925 N 1
SFX 4925 0 ümüzdeyse .

SFX 4926 N 1
SFX 4926 0 ümüzmüş .

SFX 4927 N 1
SFX 4927 0 ümüzünkilere .

SFX 4928 N 1
SFX 4928 0 ümüzünse .

SFX 4929 N 1
SFX 4929 0 ündesin .

SFX 4930 N 1
SFX 4930 0 ündeymişler .

SFX 4931 N 1
SFX 4931 0 ünkilerle .

SFX 4932 N 1
SFX 4932 0 ünüzdesiniz .

SFX 4933 N 1
SFX 4933 0 ünüzdeyseniz .

SFX 4934 N 1
SFX 4934 0 ünüzdü .

SFX 4935 N 1
SFX 4935 0 üydük .

SFX 4936 N 1
SFX 4936 0 'sü .

SFX 4937 N 1
SFX 4937 0 'yüm .

SFX 4938 N 1
SFX 4938 0 ncesidir .

SFX 4939 N 1
SFX 4939 0 ncesidirler .

SFX 4940 N 1
SFX 4940 0 ncesinde .

SFX 4941 N 1
SFX 4941 0 ncesindedir .

SFX 4942 N 1
SFX 4942 0 ncesindeki .

SFX 4943 N 1
SFX 4943 0 ncesinden .

SFX 4944 N 1
SFX 4944 0 ncesindesiniz .

SFX 4945 N 1
SFX 4945 0 ncesindeydi .

SFX 4946 N 1
SFX 4946 0 ncesindeydik .

SFX 4947 N 1
SFX 4947 0 ncesine .

SFX 4948 N 1
SFX 4948 0 ncesini .

SFX 4949 N 1
SFX 4949 0 ncesisin .

SFX 4950 N 1
SFX 4950 0 ncesisiniz .

SFX 4951 N 1
SFX 4951 0 ncesiydi .

SFX 4952 N 1
SFX 4952 0 ncesiyim .

SFX 4953 N 1
SFX 4953 0 ncesiyiz .

SFX 4954 N 1
SFX 4954 0 ncesiyken .

SFX 4955 N 1
SFX 4955 0 ncesiyle .

SFX 4956 N 1
SFX 4956 0 ncesiymiş .

SFX 4957 N 1
SFX 4957 0 ncesiyse .

SFX 4958 N 1
SFX 4958 0 ndedirler .

SFX 4959 N 1
SFX 4959 0 ndeydin .

SFX 4960 N 1
SFX 4960 0 zsindir .

SFX 4961 N 1
SFX 4961 0 irdirler .

SFX 4962 N 1
SFX 4962 0 irliğimizle .

SFX 4963 N 1
SFX 4963 0 irliğimle .

SFX 4964 N 1
SFX 4964 0 irliğinizin .

SFX 4965 N 1
SFX 4965 0 irlikleriyse .

SFX 4966 N 1
SFX 4966 0 irlikli .

SFX 4967 N 1
SFX 4967 0 irlikse .

SFX 4968 N 1
SFX 4968 0 ninkilere .

SFX 4969 N 1
SFX 4969 0 leriydiniz .

SFX 4970 N 1
SFX 4970 0 deymişsin .

SFX 4971 N 1
SFX 4971 0 dakisin .

SFX 4972 N 1
SFX 4972 0 didir .

SFX 4973 N 1
SFX 4973 0 dimce .

SFX 4974 N 1
SFX 4974 0 dimde .

SFX 4975 N 1
SFX 4975 0 dimden .

SFX 4976 N 1
SFX 4976 0 dimdir .

SFX 4977 N 1
SFX 4977 0 dime .

SFX 4978 N 1
SFX 4978 0 dimeymiş .

SFX 4979 N 1
SFX 4979 0 dimi .

SFX 4980 N 1
SFX 4980 0 dimin .

SFX 4981 N 1
SFX 4981 0 dimiz .

SFX 4982 N 1
SFX 4982 0 dimizde .

SFX 4983 N 1
SFX 4983 0 dimizden .

SFX 4984 N 1
SFX 4984 0 dimizdir .

SFX 4985 N 1
SFX 4985 0 dimize .

SFX 4986 N 1
SFX 4986 0 dimizedir .

SFX 4987 N 1
SFX 4987 0 dimizi .

SFX 4988 N 1
SFX 4988 0 dimizin .

SFX 4989 N 1
SFX 4989 0 dinde .

SFX 4990 N 1
SFX 4990 0 dindedir .

SFX 4991 N 1
SFX 4991 0 dindeki .

SFX 4992 N 1
SFX 4992 0 dinden .

SFX 4993 N 1
SFX 4993 0 dine .

SFX 4994 N 1
SFX 4994 0 dinedir .

SFX 4995 N 1
SFX 4995 0 dineydi .

SFX 4996 N 1
SFX 4996 0 dineymiş .

SFX 4997 N 1
SFX 4997 0 dini .

SFX 4998 N 1
SFX 4998 0 dinin .

SFX 4999 N 1
SFX 4999 0 dinizden .

SFX 5000 N 1
SFX 5000 0 dinize .

SFX 5001 N 1
SFX 5001 0 dinizi .

SFX 5002 N 1
SFX 5002 0 dinizle .

SFX 5003 N 1
SFX 5003 0 diyle .

SFX 5004 N 1
SFX 5004 0 larımızdayken .

SFX 5005 N 1
SFX 5005 0 taydın .

SFX 5006 N 1
SFX 5006 0 ınkilerin .

SFX 5007 N 1
SFX 5007 0 mdendim .

SFX 5008 N 1
SFX 5008 0 mdik .

SFX 5009 N 1
SFX 5009 0 mdiler .

SFX 5010 N 1
SFX 5010 0 mdirler .

SFX 5011 N 1
SFX 5011 0 mdiyse .

SFX 5012 N 1
SFX 5012 0 mmişim .
