dictionaries/tr/index.dic
görmüş/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,43,44,45,252,255,256,326,329,331,334,365,383,421,774,1119,1268,1683,1684,1800,1918,2228,3518,4810
görüşebil/83,105,106,107,108,109,110,111,112,119,120,319,341,342,344,413,526,584,617,618,626,650,651,652,658,666,670,671,672,676,678,679,683,684,685,686,688,693,694,695,697,698,699,700,701,702,703,705,706,710,711,717,718,719,720,721,857,1273,1293,2206,4864
gözaltı/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,51,53,54,56,57,64,65,66,70,121,123,125,128,131,133,134,136,143,144,146,153,186,439,447,487,524,796,799,941,943,1089,1093,1130,1362,1363,1365,1380,1586,1587,1588,1590,1592,1594,1595,1596,2095,2096,2097,2099,2100,2101,2102,2295,3842,4876
gözde/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,54,255,256,257,258,259,260,311,314,315,325,327,328,329,331,333,334,335,336,338,339,349,350,355,358,359,360,366,367,371,387,388,390,416,494,503,504,1671,4877
gözlü/6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,54,252,339,363,365,386,389,421,768,769,770,771,772,773,824,1268,1668,1695,1698,1703,1704,1994,1995,2891,3719,4879,4880
gözyaş/26,27,28,29,48,49,50,61,82,122,123,124,125,128,135,151,178,224,231,232,234,321,430,431,432,433,434,435,437,438,439,440,441,442,520,521,522,576,577,582,590,591,632,633,736,793,796,797,802,803,880,881,882,883,885,886,889,892,895,926,985,1005,1008,1010,1021,1034,1042,1524,1755,4887,4888
güdüm/35,38,39,46,47,254,255,283,1118,1119,1120,1621,1622,1792,1793,1800,1808,1815,1816,1821,2904,3488,3489,4897
Gül/35,36,38,39,41,237,244,303,306,768,1539,1540,1863,1977,3265,4687,4901
gürbüz/9999,3,33,34,35,36,39,44,45,319,361,768,776,1118,1119,4902
Gürcü/35,36,37,39,41,244,308,329,2591,4936,4937
hepi/5,8,38,53,257,259,260,311,312,313,314,315,323,325,335,339,346,348,359,390,391,392,395,396,398,401,407,408,409,410,411,412,413,552,1239,1240,1484,1486,2225,2246,2247,3254,4048,4495,4528,4809,5115,5116,5221,5222,5223,5224,5225,5226,5227
ırak/14,22,23,24,25,26,52,74,91,92,140,141,163,192,210,211,223,428,585,589,625,734,786,787,860,861,862,863,865,866,867,868,906,925,1397,1398,1416,1417,1418,2087,2090,2635,4891,5258
mü/768,772,773,824,1993,1994,1995,1996,1997,1998,1999,2000,3719,4800
müftü/3,6,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,255,256,326,328,329,331,332,333,334,335,338,339,363,365,367,371,373,374,377,770,771,1693,1694,1703,1704,1705,1706,2123,2124,4299,4854
öğrendik/38,39,43,255,256,283,327,328,329,331,332,333,335,336,338,339,366,367,368,369,370,371,372,373,374,376,381,382,420,501,1191,1193,1326,1358,1456,2932,4801
ölmüş/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,43,44,45,47,255,256,326,328,329,331,335,365,373,374,381,382,420,421,1690,4884
örf/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,252,255,256,283,329,331,333,335,339,371,373,374,513,774,777,1118,1119,1120,1122,1621,1652,1653,1680,1681,1682,1683,1792,1796,1800,1806,1823,4869
özürlü/9999,3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,54,252,255,256,283,326,329,331,335,339,363,373,374,426,507,768,769,770,771,772,773,824,979,1668,1694,1696,1703,1704,1705,1706,1993,1994,1997,2000,2123,2892,2893,2895,2901,4298,4800,4896
rahip/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,223,252,255,256,288,318,326,329,333,335,338,339,341,363,365,374,377,421,1673,4795
sömürücü/3,6,8,35,37,38,39,41,255,256,333,335,339,365,768,770,772,1183,2123,4799
sözlü/9999,2,3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,53,54,252,255,283,333,335,339,386,399,426,768,769,770,771,772,773,824,1664,1668,1677,1693,1694,1695,1703,1704,1705,1706,1994,1995,1996,2000,2588,4800
Şükrü/3064,4936
TEFE/237,238,294,308,309,4904
üçüncü/9999,2,3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,53,54,252,255,256,323,333,335,339,426,507,768,769,770,771,772,773,1677,1693,1694,1696,1699,1703,1704,1705,1706,1994,1995,1997,2000,2123,2124,2581,2901,2902,3976,4280,4296,4298,4798,4853,4854,4895,5689,5691,5742,6399
vazgeçilebil/105,107,111,119,120,342,344,413,693,699,720,4961
vazgeçilme/3,5,6,7,54,73,105,257,259,260,311,313,314,315,319,333,341,344,345,349,355,359,413,504,526,598,715,1165,1168,1275,1276,1282,1287,2682,2683,2729,2733,3238,4824
virtüöz/3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,44,45,46,47,255,256,329,333,335,339,371,374,377,768,776,1118,1119,1120,1652,1653,1654,4898
